Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 1. General Provisions

38-33.3-101.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Colorado Common Interest Ownership Act”.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1701, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-102.
Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares, as follows:

That it is in the best interests of the state and its citizens to establish a clear, comprehensive, and uniform framework for the creation and operation of common interest communities;

That the continuation of the economic prosperity of Colorado is dependent upon the strengthening of homeowner associations in common interest communities financially through the setting of budget guidelines, the creation of statutory assessment liens, the granting of six months’ lien priority, the facilitation of borrowing, and more certain powers in the association to sue on behalf of the owners and through enhancing the financial stability of associations by increasing the association’s powers to collect delinquent assessments, late charges, fines, and enforcement costs;

That it is the policy of this state to give developers flexible development rights with specific obligations within a uniform structure of development of a common interest community that extends through the transition to owner control;

That it is the policy of this state to promote effective and efficient property management through defined operational requirements that preserve flexibility for such homeowner associations;

That it is the policy of this state to promote the availability of funds for financing the development of such homeowner associations by enabling lenders to extend the financial services to a greater market on a safer, more predictable basis because of standardized practices and prudent insurance and risk management obligations.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1701, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-103.
Definitions.

As used in the declaration and bylaws of an association, unless specifically provided otherwise or unless the context otherwise requires, and in this article:

“Affiliate of a declarant” means any person who controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with a declarant. A person controls a declarant if the person: Is a general partner, officer, director, or employee of the declarant; directly or indirectly, or acting in concert with one or more other persons or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing more than twenty percent of the voting interests of the declarant; controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the declarant; or has contributed more than twenty percent of the capital of the declarant. A person is controlled by a declarant if the declarant: Is a general partner, officer, director, or employee of the person; directly or indirectly, or acting in concert with one or more other persons or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing more than twenty percent of the voting interests of the person; controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the person; or has contributed more than twenty percent of the capital of the person. Control does not exist if the powers described in this subsection (1) are held solely as security for an obligation and are not exercised.

“Allocated interests” means the following interests allocated to each unit:

In a condominium, the undivided interest in the common elements, the common expense liability, and votes in the association;

In a cooperative, the common expense liability and the ownership interest and votes in the association; and

In a planned community, the common expense liability and votes in the association.

(2.5)

“Approved for development” means that all or some portion of a particular parcel of real property is zoned or otherwise approved for construction of residential and other improvements and authorized for specified densities by the local land use authority having jurisdiction over such real property and includes any conceptual or final planned unit development approval.

“Association” or “unit owners’ association” means a unit owners’ association organized under section 38-33.3-301.

“Bylaws” means any instruments, however denominated, which are adopted by the association for the regulation and management of the association, including any amendments to those instruments.

“Common elements” means:

In a condominium or cooperative, all portions of the condominium or cooperative other than the units; and

In a planned community, any real estate within a planned community owned or leased by the association, other than a unit.

“Common expense liability” means the liability for common expenses allocated to each unit pursuant to section 38-33.3-207.

“Common expenses” means expenditures made or liabilities incurred by or on behalf of the association, together with any allocations to reserves.

“Common interest community” means real estate described in a declaration with respect to which a person, by virtue of such person’s ownership of a unit, is obligated to pay for real estate taxes, insurance premiums, maintenance, or improvement of other real estate described in a declaration. Ownership of a unit does not include holding a leasehold interest in a unit of less than forty years, including renewal options. The period of the leasehold interest, including renewal options, is measured from the date the initial term commences.

“Condominium” means a common interest community in which portions of the real estate are designated for separate ownership and the remainder of which is designated for common ownership solely by the owners of the separate ownership portions. A common interest community is not a condominium unless the undivided interests in the common elements are vested in the unit owners.

“Cooperative” means a common interest community in which the real property is owned by an association, each member of which is entitled by virtue of such member’s ownership interest in the association to exclusive possession of a unit.

“Dealer” means a person in the business of selling units for such person’s own account.

“Declarant” means any person or group of persons acting in concert who:

As part of a common promotional plan, offers to dispose of to a purchaser such declarant’s interest in a unit not previously disposed of to a purchaser; or

Reserves or succeeds to any special declarant right.

“Declaration” means any recorded instruments however denominated, that create a common interest community, including any amendments to those instruments and also including, but not limited to, plats and maps.

“Development rights” means any right or combination of rights reserved by a declarant in the declaration to:

Add real estate to a common interest community;

Create units, common elements, or limited common elements within a common interest community;

Subdivide units or convert units into common elements; or

Withdraw real estate from a common interest community.

“Dispose” or “disposition” means a voluntary transfer of any legal or equitable interest in a unit, but the term does not include the transfer or release of a security interest.

“Executive board” means the body, regardless of name, designated in the declaration to act on behalf of the association.

(16.5)

“Horizontal boundary” means a plane of elevation relative to a described bench mark that defines either a lower or an upper dimension of a unit such that the real estate respectively below or above the defined plane is not a part of the unit.

“Identifying number” means a symbol or address that identifies only one unit in a common interest community.

(17.5)

“Large planned community” means a planned community that meets the criteria set forth in section 38-33.3-116.3 (1).

“Leasehold common interest community” means a common interest community in which all or a portion of the real estate is subject to a lease, the expiration or termination of which will terminate the common interest community or reduce its size.

“Limited common element” means a portion of the common elements allocated by the declaration or by operation of section 38-33.3-202 (1)(b) or (1)(d) for the exclusive use of one or more units but fewer than all of the units.

(19.5)

“Map” means that part of a declaration that depicts all or any portion of a common interest community in three dimensions, is executed by a person that is authorized by this title to execute a declaration relating to the common interest community, and is recorded in the real estate records in every county in which any portion of the common interest community is located. A map is required for a common interest community with units having a horizontal boundary. A map and a plat may be combined in one instrument.

“Master association” means an organization that is authorized to exercise some or all of the powers of one or more associations on behalf of one or more common interest communities or for the benefit of the unit owners of one or more common interest communities.

“Person” means a natural person, a corporation, a partnership, an association, a trust, or any other entity or any combination thereof.

(21.5)

“Phased community” means a common interest community in which the declarant retains development rights.

“Planned community” means a common interest community that is not a condominium or cooperative. A condominium or cooperative may be part of a planned community.

(22.5)

“Plat” means that part of a declaration that is a land survey plat as set forth in section 38-51-106, depicts all or any portion of a common interest community in two dimensions, is executed by a person that is authorized by this title to execute a declaration relating to the common interest community, and is recorded in the real estate records in every county in which any portion of the common interest community is located. A plat and a map may be combined in one instrument.

“Proprietary lease” means an agreement with the association pursuant to which a member is entitled to exclusive possession of a unit in a cooperative.

“Purchaser” means a person, other than a declarant or a dealer, who by means of a transfer acquires a legal or equitable interest in a unit, other than:

A leasehold interest in a unit of less than forty years, including renewal options, with the period of the leasehold interest, including renewal options, being measured from the date the initial term commences; or

A security interest.

“Real estate” means any leasehold or other estate or interest in, over, or under land, including structures, fixtures, and other improvements and interests that, by custom, usage, or law, pass with a conveyance of land though not described in the contract of sale or instrument of conveyance. “Real estate” includes parcels with or without horizontal boundaries and spaces that may be filled with air or water.

“Residential use” means use for dwelling or recreational purposes but does not include spaces or units primarily used for commercial income from, or service to, the public.

“Rules and regulations” means any instruments, however denominated, which are adopted by the association for the regulation and management of the common interest community, including any amendment to those instruments.

“Security interest” means an interest in real estate or personal property created by contract or conveyance which secures payment or performance of an obligation. The term includes a lien created by a mortgage, deed of trust, trust deed, security deed, contract for deed, land sales contract, lease intended as security, assignment of lease or rents intended as security, pledge of an ownership interest in an association, and any other consensual lien or title retention contract intended as security for an obligation.

“Special declarant rights” means rights reserved for the benefit of a declarant to perform the following acts as specified in parts 2 and 3 of this article: To complete improvements indicated on plats and maps filed with the declaration; to exercise any development right; to maintain sales offices, management offices, signs advertising the common interest community, and models; to use easements through the common elements for the purpose of making improvements within the common interest community or within real estate which may be added to the common interest community; to make the common interest community subject to a master association; to merge or consolidate a common interest community of the same form of ownership; or to appoint or remove any officer of the association or any executive board member during any period of declarant control.

“Unit” means a physical portion of the common interest community which is designated for separate ownership or occupancy and the boundaries of which are described in or determined from the declaration. If a unit in a cooperative is owned by a unit owner or is sold, conveyed, voluntarily or involuntarily encumbered, or otherwise transferred by a unit owner, the interest in that unit which is owned, sold, conveyed, encumbered, or otherwise transferred is the right to possession of that unit under a proprietary lease, coupled with the allocated interests of that unit, and the association’s interest in that unit is not thereby affected.

“Unit owner” means the declarant or other person who owns a unit, or a lessee of a unit in a leasehold common interest community whose lease expires simultaneously with any lease, the expiration or termination of which will remove the unit from the common interest community but does not include a person having an interest in a unit solely as security for an obligation. In a condominium or planned community, the declarant is the owner of any unit created by the declaration until that unit is conveyed to another person; in a cooperative, the declarant is treated as the owner of any unit to which allocated interests have been allocated pursuant to section 38-33.3-207 until that unit has been conveyed to another person, who may or may not be a declarant under this article.

“Vertical boundary” means the defined limit of a unit that is not a horizontal boundary of that unit.

“Xeriscape” means the combined application of the seven principles of landscape planning and design, soil analysis and improvement, hydro zoning of plants, use of practical turf areas, uses of mulches, irrigation efficiency, and appropriate maintenance under section 38-35.7-107 (1)(a)(III)(A).

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1702, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

IP, (8), and (25) amended and (16.5), (19.5), (22.5), and (32) added, p. 642, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 94:

(17.5) added, p. 2845, § 1, effective July 1; (22.5) amended, p. 1509, § 44, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2.5) added, p. 236, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(22.5) amended, p. 151, § 2, effective March 28.

L. 98:

(20) amended, p. 477, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(21.5) added, p. 1215, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 2013:

(33) added,(SB 13-183), ch. 187, p. 757, § 2, effective May 10.

38-33.3-104.
Variation by agreement.

Except as expressly provided in this article, provisions of this article may not be varied by agreement, and rights conferred by this article may not be waived. A declarant may not act under a power of attorney or use any other device to evade the limitations or prohibitions of this article or the declaration.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1707, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-105.
Separate titles and taxation.

In a cooperative, unless the declaration provides that a unit owner’s interest in a unit and its allocated interests is personal property, that interest is real estate for all purposes.

In a condominium or planned community with common elements, each unit that has been created, together with its interest in the common elements, constitutes for all purposes a separate parcel of real estate and must be separately assessed and taxed. The valuation of the common elements shall be assessed proportionately to each unit, in the case of a condominium in accordance with such unit’s allocated interests in the common elements, and in the case of a planned community in accordance with such unit’s allocated common expense liability, set forth in the declaration, and the common elements shall not be separately taxed or assessed. Upon the filing for recording of a declaration for a condominium or planned community with common elements, the declarant shall deliver a copy of such filing to the assessor of each county in which such declaration was filed.

In a planned community without common elements, the real estate comprising such planned community may be taxed and assessed in any manner provided by law.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1707, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 643, § 2, effective April 30.

38-33.3-106.
Applicability of local ordinances, regulations, and building codes.

A building code may not impose any requirement upon any structure in a common interest community which it would not impose upon a physically identical development under a different form of ownership; except that a minimum one hour fire wall may be required between units.

In condominiums and cooperatives, no zoning, subdivision, or other real estate use law, ordinance, or regulation may prohibit the condominium or cooperative form of ownership or impose any requirement upon a condominium or cooperative which it would not impose upon a physically identical development under a different form of ownership.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1707, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-106.5.
Prohibitions contrary to public policy - patriotic, political, or religious expression - emergency vehicles - fire prevention - renewable energy generation devices - affordable housing - drought prevention measures - child care - definitions.

Notwithstanding any provision in the declaration, bylaws, or rules and regulations of the association to the contrary, an association shall not prohibit any of the following:

The display of a flag on a unit owner’s property, in a window of the unit, or on a balcony adjoining the unit. The association shall not prohibit or regulate the display of flags on the basis of their subject matter, message, or content; except that the association may prohibit flags bearing commercial messages. The association may adopt reasonable, content-neutral rules to regulate the number, location, and size of flags and flagpoles, but shall not prohibit the installation of a flag or flagpole.

Repealed.

The display of a sign by the owner or occupant of a unit on property within the boundaries of the unit or in a window of the unit. The association shall not prohibit or regulate the display of window signs or yard signs on the basis of their subject matter, message, or content; except that the association may prohibit signs bearing commercial messages. The association may establish reasonable, content-neutral sign regulations based on the number, placement, or size of the signs or on other objective factors.

The display of a religious item or symbol on the entry door or entry door frame of a unit; except that an association may prohibit the display or affixing of an item or symbol to the extent that it:

Threatens public health or safety;

Hinders the opening or closing of an entry door;

Violates federal or state law or a municipal ordinance;

Contains graphics, language, or any display that is obscene or otherwise illegal; or

Individually or in combination with other religious items or symbols, covers an area greater than thirty-six square inches.

If an association is performing maintenance, repair, or replacement of an entry door or door frame that serves a unit owner’s separate interest, the unit owner may be required to remove a religious item or symbol during the time the work is being performed. After completion of the association’s work, the unit owner may again display or affix the religious item or symbol. The association shall provide individual notice to the unit owner regarding the temporary removal of the religious item or symbol.

As used in this subsection (1)(c.5), “religious item or symbol” means an item or symbol displayed because of a sincerely held religious belief.

The parking of a motor vehicle by the occupant of a unit on a street, driveway, or guest parking area in the common interest community if the vehicle is required to be available at designated periods at such occupant’s residence as a condition of the occupant’s employment and all of the following criteria are met:

The vehicle has a gross vehicle weight rating of ten thousand pounds or less;

The occupant is a bona fide member of a volunteer fire department or is employed by a primary provider of emergency fire fighting, law enforcement, ambulance, or emergency medical services;

The vehicle bears an official emblem or other visible designation of the emergency service provider; and

Parking of the vehicle can be accomplished without obstructing emergency access or interfering with the reasonable needs of other unit owners or occupants to use streets, driveways, and guest parking spaces within the common interest community.

The removal by a unit owner of trees, shrubs, or other vegetation to create defensible space around a dwelling for fire mitigation purposes, so long as such removal complies with a written defensible space plan created for the property by the Colorado state forest service, an individual or company certified by a local governmental entity to create such a plan, or the fire chief, fire marshal, or fire protection district within whose jurisdiction the unit is located, and is no more extensive than necessary to comply with such plan. The plan shall be registered with the association before the commencement of work. The association may require changes to the plan if the association obtains the consent of the person, official, or agency that originally created the plan. The work shall comply with applicable association standards regarding slash removal, stump height, revegetation, and contractor regulations.

(Deleted by amendment,

L

. 2006, p. 1215, § 2, effective May 26, 2006.)

Reasonable modifications to a unit or to common elements as necessary to afford a person with disabilities full use and enjoyment of the unit in accordance with the federal “Fair Housing Act of 1968”, 42 U.S.C. sec. 3604 (f)(3)(A);

The right of a unit owner, public or private, to restrict or specify by deed, covenant, or other document:

The permissible sale price, rental rate, or lease rate of the unit; or

Occupancy or other requirements designed to promote affordable or workforce housing as such terms may be defined by the local housing authority.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the provisions of this subsection (1)(h) shall only apply to a county the population of which is less than one hundred thousand persons and that contains a ski lift licensed by the passenger tramway safety board created in section

12-150-104 (1)

.

The provisions of this paragraph (h) shall not apply to a declarant-controlled community.

Nothing in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (h) shall be construed to prohibit the future owner of a unit against which a restriction or specification described in such subparagraph has been placed from lifting such restriction or specification on such unit as long as any unit so released is replaced by another unit in the same common interest community on which the restriction or specification applies and the unit subject to the restriction or specification is reasonably equivalent to the unit being released in the determination of the beneficiary of the restriction or specification.

Except as otherwise provided in the declaration of the common interest community, any unit subject to the provisions of this paragraph (h) shall only be occupied by the owner of the unit.

The use of xeriscape, nonvegetative turf grass, or drought-tolerant vegetative landscapes to provide ground covering to property for which a unit owner is responsible, including a limited common element or property owned by the unit owner. Associations may adopt and enforce design or aesthetic guidelines or rules that apply to nonvegetative turf grass and drought-tolerant vegetative landscapes or regulate the type, number, and placement of drought-tolerant plantings and hardscapes that may be installed on a unit owner’s property or on a limited common element or other property for which the unit owner is responsible. An association may restrict the installation of nonvegetative turf grass to rear yard locations only.
(i) (I) (A) The use of xeriscape, nonvegetative turf grass, or drought-tolerant vegetative landscapes to provide ground covering to property for which a unit owner is responsible, including a limited common element or property owned by the unit owner. Associations may adopt and enforce design or aesthetic guidelines or rules that apply to nonvegetative turf grass and drought-tolerant vegetative landscapes or regulate the type, number, and placement of drought-tolerant plantings and hardscapes that may be installed on a unit owner’s property or on a limited common element or other property for which the unit owner is responsible. An association may restrict the installation of nonvegetative turf grass to rear yard locations only.

This subsection (1)(i), as amended by House Bill 21-1229, enacted in 2021, does not apply to an association that includes time share units, as defined in section

38-33-110 (7)

.

This paragraph (i) does not supersede any subdivision regulation of a county, city and county, or other municipality.

The use of a rain barrel, as defined in section

37-96.5-102 (1)

, C.R.S., to collect precipitation from a residential rooftop in accordance with section

37-96.5-103

, C.R.S.

This paragraph (j) does not confer upon a resident of a common interest community the right to place a rain barrel on property or to connect a rain barrel to any property that is:

L

eased, except with permission of the lessor;

A common element or a limited common element of a common interest community;

Maintained by the unit owners’ association for a common interest community; or

Attached to one or more other units, except with permission of the owners of the other units.

A common interest community may impose reasonable aesthetic requirements that govern the placement or external appearance of a rain barrel.

The operation of a family child care home, as defined in section 26-6-102 (13), that is licensed under part 1 of article 6 of title 26.

This subsection (1)(k) does not supersede any of the association’s regulations concerning architectural control, parking, landscaping, noise, or other matters not specific to the operation of a business per se. The association shall make reasonable accommodation for fencing requirements applicable to licensed family child care homes.

This subsection (1)(k) does not apply to a community qualified as housing for older persons under the federal “Housing for Older Persons Act of 1995”, as amended, Pub.L. 104-76.

The association may require the owner or operator of a family child care home located in the common interest community to carry liability insurance, at reasonable levels determined by the association’s executive board, providing coverage for any aspect of the operation of the family child care home for personal injury, death, damage to personal property, and damage to real property that occurs in or on the common elements, in the unit where the family child care home is located, or in any other unit located in the common interest community. The association shall be named as an additional insured on the liability insurance the family child care home is required to carry, and such insurance must be primary to any insurance the association is required to carry under the terms of the declaration.

(1.5)

Notwithstanding any provision in the declaration, bylaws, or rules and regulations of the association to the contrary, an association shall not effectively prohibit renewable energy generation devices, as defined in section

38-30-168

.

Notwithstanding any provision in the declaration, bylaws, or rules and regulations of the association to the contrary, an association shall not require the use of cedar shakes or other flammable roofing materials.

History.

Source:
L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1373, § 2, effective June 6.

L. 2006:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), IP(1)(d), (1)(d)(II), (1)(d)(IV), and (1)(f) amended and (2) added, p. 1215, § 2, effective May 26.

L. 2008:

(1)(g) added, p. 556, § 1, effective July 1; (1.5) added, p. 620, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(1)(h) added,(HB 09-1220), ch. 166, p. 732, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2013:

(1)(i) added,(SB 13-183), ch. 187, p. 757, § 3, effective May 10.

L. 2016:

(1)(j) added,(HB 16-1005), ch. 161, p. 511, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2019:

(1)(i)(I) amended,(HB 19-1050), ch. 25, p. 84, § 1, effective March 7; (1)(h)(II)(A) amended,(HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1723, § 233, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(1)(c.5) added,(HB 20-1200), ch. 188, p. 861, § 3, effective June 30; (1)(k) added,(SB 20-126), ch. 250, p. 1222, § 1, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) and (1)(c) amended and (1)(b) repealed,(SB 21-1310), ch. 415, p. 2766, § 1, effective September 7; (1)(i)(I) amended,(HB 21-1229), ch. 409, p. 2708, § 3, effective September 7.

Editor’s note:

Section 5 of chapter 409 (HB 21-1229), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that the act changing this section applies to conduct occurring on or after September 7, 2021.

38-33.3-106.7.
Unreasonable restrictions on energy efficiency measures - definitions.

Notwithstanding any provision in the declaration, bylaws, or rules and regulations of the association to the contrary, an association shall not effectively prohibit the installation or use of an energy efficiency measure.

As used in this section, “energy efficiency measure” means a device or structure that reduces the amount of energy derived from fossil fuels that is consumed by a residence or business located on the real property. “Energy efficiency measure” is further limited to include only the following types of devices or structures:

An awning, shutter, trellis, ramada, or other shade structure that is marketed for the purpose of reducing energy consumption;

A garage or attic fan and any associated vents or louvers;

An evaporative cooler;

An energy-efficient outdoor lighting device, including without limitation a light fixture containing a coiled or straight fluorescent light bulb, and any solar recharging panel, motion detector, or other equipment connected to the lighting device;

A retractable clothesline; and

A heat pump.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to:

Reasonable aesthetic provisions that govern the dimensions, placement, or external appearance of an energy efficiency measure. In creating reasonable aesthetic provisions, common interest communities shall consider:

The impact on the purchase price and operating costs of the energy efficiency measure;

The impact on the performance of the energy efficiency measure; and

The criteria contained in the governing documents of the common interest community.

Bona fide safety requirements, consistent with an applicable building code or recognized safety standard, for the protection of persons and property.

This section shall not be construed to confer upon any property owner the right to place an energy efficiency measure on property that is:

Owned by another person;

Leased, except with permission of the lessor;

Collateral for a commercial loan, except with permission of the secured party; or

A limited common element or general common element of a common interest community.

History.

Source:
L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 618, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2021:

(1)(b)(IV) and (1)(b)(V) amended and (1)(b)(VI) added,(SB 21-246), ch. 283, p. 1675, § 2, effective September 7.